Wisconsin, session 2025, AB594.
do enact as follows:AB594,11Section 1. 71.05 (6) (b) 57. of the statutes is created to read:AB594,2,5271.05 (6) (b) 57. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, an 3amount paid in the taxable year by a claimant as principal or interest on any 4qualified education loan, as defined in section 221 (d) of the Internal Revenue Code, 5of the claimant, calculated as follows:AB594,2,206a. Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, an amount equal to not 7more than $5,130. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026, the dollar 8amounts in this subd. 57. a. shall be increased each year by a percentage equal to 9the percentage change between the U.S. consumer price index for all urban 10consumers, U.S. city average, for the month of August of the previous year and the 11U.S. consumer price index for all urban consumers, U.S. city average, for the month 12of August 2025, as determined by the federal department of labor, except that the 13adjustment may occur only if the resulting amount is greater than the 14corresponding amount that was calculated for the previous year. Each amount that 15is revised under this subd. 57. a. shall be rounded to the nearest multiple of $10 if 16the revised amount is not a multiple of $10 or, if the revised amount is a multiple of 17$5, such an amount shall be increased to the next higher multiple of $10. The 18department of revenue shall annually adjust the changes in dollar amounts 19required under this subd. 57. a. and incorporate the changes into the income tax 20forms and instructions.AB594,2,2221b. No subtraction may be allowed under this subdivision for any amount that 22is withdrawn from a college savings account, as described in s. 224.50.AB594,3,223c. No subtraction may be allowed under this subdivision for any amount the 24claimant deducts from gross income for interest paid on a qualified education loan 1under section 221 of the Internal Revenue Code in the claimant’s calculation of 2federal adjusted gross income in the year to which the claim relates.AB594,3,33